Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.07.110

Projects or financing—Exemption from certain restrictions on procedures for awarding contracts.

A project or the financing or refinancing thereof pursuant to this chapter shall not be subject to the requirements of any law or rule relating to competitive bidding, lease performance bonds, or other restrictions imposed on the procedure for award of contracts.

[ 1983 c 169 s 11.]